Massachusetts, session 194th, H3226.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of section 2 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following
subparagraph:-
(R) Any amount received by a veteran who is permanently and totally disabled that
would be includible in gross income for such taxable year by reason of the discharge of an
educational loan under section 108(f)(5)(A)(iii) of the Code.
of 1